test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_tuhhid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: staavii
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: stäävejus
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Du1: stäävejoon
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Du2: stäävejee
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Du3: stäävejus
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: stäävejop
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: staaviđ
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: stäävejus
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: staavii
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: staavim
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: staaviiččii
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: staaviižii
    staaviđ+V+PrsPrc: [stäävejeijee, stäävejijjee]
    staaviđ+V+PrfPrc: staavim
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Nom: staavim
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Ess: staaviimin
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Loc: staaviimist
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Ill: staaviimân
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Com: staaviidijn
    staaviđ+V+VAbess: staaviihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - nirviđ: # 
    nirviđ+V+Inf: nirviđ
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nirviim
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nirviih
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nirvee
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: nirvejeen
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: nirviivettee
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: nirviv
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nirvip
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nirviivetteđ
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nirvejeh
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nirvejim
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nirvejih
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nirvij
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: nirvijm
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: nirvijd
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: nirvijn
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nirvijm
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nirvijd
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nirvejii
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: nirviiččim
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: nirviiččih
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: nirviiččij
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: nirviiččáim
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: nirviiččáid
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: nirviiččáin
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: nirviiččijm
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: nirviiččijd
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: nirviiččii
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: nirviižeem
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: nirviižeeh
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: nirviš     
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: nirviižeen
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: nirvišvettee     
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: nirviižává
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: nirviižep
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: nirvišvetteđ      
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: nirviižeh

    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: nirvii
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: nirvejus
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Du1: nirvejoon
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Du2: nirvejee
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Du3: nirvejus
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: nirvejop
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: nirviđ
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: nirvejus
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: nirvii
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: nirvim
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: nirviiččii
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: nirviižii
    nirviđ+V+PrsPrc: [nirvejeijee, nirvejijjee]
    nirviđ+V+PrfPrc: nirvim
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Nom: nirvim
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Ess: nirviimin
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Loc: nirviimist
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Ill: nirviimân
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Com: nirviidijn
    nirviđ+V+VAbess: nirviihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - rievviđ: # 
    rievviđ+V+Inf: rievviđ
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rievviim
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rievviih
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rievvee
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: rievvejeen
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: rievviivettee
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: rievviv
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: rievvip
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rievviivetteđ
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rievvejeh
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rievvejim
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rievvejih
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rievvij
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: rievvijm
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: rievvijd
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rievvijn
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: rievvijm
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rievvijd
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: rievvejii
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: rievviiččim
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: rievviiččih
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: rievviiččij
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: rievviiččáim
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: rievviiččáid
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: rievviiččáin
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: rievviiččijm
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: rievviiččijd
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: rievviiččii
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: rievviižeem
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: rievviižeeh
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: rievviš     
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: rievviižeen
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: rievvišvettee     
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: rievviižává
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: rievviižep
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: rievvišvetteđ    
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: rievviižeh

    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: rievvii
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: rievvejus
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Du1: rievvejoon
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Du2: rievvejee
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Du3: rievvejus
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: rievvejop
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: rievviđ
    rievviđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: rievvejus
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: rievvii
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: rievvim
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: rievviiččii
    rievviđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: rievviižii
    rievviđ+V+PrsPrc: [rievvejeijee, rievvejijjee]
    rievviđ+V+PrfPrc: rievvim
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Nom: rievvim
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Ess: rievviimin
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Loc: rievviimist
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Ill: rievviimân
    rievviđ+V+Actio+Com: rievviidijn
    rievviđ+V+VAbess: rievviihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - keksiđ: # 
    keksiđ+V+Inf: keksiđ
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keksiim
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: keksiih
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keksee
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: keksejeen
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: keksiivettee
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: keksiv
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: keksip
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: keksiivetteđ
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: keksejeh
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keksejim
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: keksejih
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keksij
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: keksijm
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: keksijd
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: keksijn
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: keksijm
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: keksijd
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: keksejii
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: keksiiččim
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: keksiiččih
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: keksiiččij
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: keksiiččáim
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: keksiiččáid
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: keksiiččáin
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: keksiiččijm
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: keksiiččijd
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: keksiiččii
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: keksiižeem
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: keksiižeeh
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: keksiš      
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: keksiižeen
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: keksišvettee      
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: keksiižává
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: keksiižep
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: keksišvetteđ     
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: keksiižeh

    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: keksii
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: keksejus
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: keksejoon
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: keksejee
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: keksejus
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: keksejop
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: keksiđ
    keksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: keksejus
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: keksii
    keksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: keksim
    keksiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: keksiiččii
    keksiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: keksiižii
    keksiđ+V+PrsPrc: [keksejeijee, keksejijjee]
    keksiđ+V+PrfPrc: keksim
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Nom: keksim
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Ess: keksiimin
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Loc: keksiimist
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Ill: keksiimân
    keksiđ+V+Actio+Com: keksiidijn
    keksiđ+V+VAbess: keksiihánnáá
    
    
  Verb - snuittiđ: # 
    snuittiđ+V+Inf: snuittiđ
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuittiim
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: snuittiih
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuittee
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: snuittejeen
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: snuittiivettee
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: snuittiv
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: snuittip
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: snuittiivetteđ
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: snuittejeh
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: snuittejim
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: snuittejih
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: snuittij
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: snuittijm
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: snuittijd
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: snuittijn
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: snuittijm
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: snuittijd
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: snuittejii
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: snuittiiččim
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: snuittiiččih
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: snuittiiččij
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: snuittiiččáim
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: snuittiiččáid
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: snuittiiččáin
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: snuittiiččijm
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: snuittiiččijd
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: snuittiiččii
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: snuittiižeem
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: snuittiižeeh
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: snuittiš      
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: snuittiižeen
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: snuittišvettee      
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: snuittiižává
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: snuittiižep
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: snuittišvetteđ      
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: snuittiižeh

    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: snuittii
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: snuittejus
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: snuittejoon
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: snuittejee
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: snuittejus
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: snuittejop
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: snuittiđ
    snuittiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: snuittejus
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: snuittii
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: snuittim
    snuittiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: snuittiiččii
    snuittiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: snuittiižii
    snuittiđ+V+PrsPrc: [snuittejeijee, snuittejijjee]
    snuittiđ+V+PrfPrc: snuittim
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Nom: snuittim
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Ess: snuittiimin
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Loc: snuittiimist
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Ill: snuittiimân
    snuittiđ+V+Actio+Com: snuittiidijn
    snuittiđ+V+VAbess: snuittiihánnáá
